Arkansas, session 2025, SB581.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 88, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 15 — Poultry Integrators Deceptive Trade Practices and Taxpayer
Protection Act

4-88-1501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Poultry
Integrators Deceptive Trade Practices and Taxpayer Protection Act".

4-88-1502. Poultry integrator transparency — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "poultry integrator" means a company that
owns poultry throughout the poultry growing process by supplying food,
medicine, or other needs for the poultry under a contract with a grower.
(b) An owner or operator of a poultry integrator shall not:
(1) Fail to disclose a material fact related to the business
health of the poultry integrator's business to a grower in contract
*CRH151*
03/31/2025 10:46:55 AM CRH151

SB581
negotiations or under contract with the poultry integrator;
(2) Require the grower to make costly capital improvements or
changes to the grower's poultry houses or the manner of growing without
adequate assurance that the poultry integrator will fulfill its obligations
under the poultry contract with the grower;
(3) In the event the poultry integrator will no longer be able
to remain in business, fail to take all reasonable steps to ensure the
poultry subject to a contract between the poultry integrator and the grower
will be adequately taken care of; or
(4) Commit any deceptive and unconscionable trade practice as
described in § 4-88-107.

4-88-1503. Liability for poultry integrators — Penalties.
(a) An owner or operator of a poultry integrator that violates this
subchapter is liable if the poultry integrator knowingly engages in an action
described under § 4-88-1502(b).
(b)(1) As authorized under § 4-88-103, a prosecutor may initiate an
enforcement action against the owner or operator of a poultry integrator who
allegedly violates § 4-88-1502.
(2) As authorized under § 4-88-104, the Attorney General may
initiate an enforcement action against the owner or operator of a poultry
integrator who allegedly commits a violation of § 4-88-1502.
(c) The owner or operator of a poultry integrator that violates this
subchapter is, upon conviction, guilty of a Class B felony.
(d) A grower who is injured by the violation of this subchapter by a
poultry integrator may:
(1) File a civil action for damages; and
(2) Be awarded damages, fees, costs, and reasonable attorney's
fees.







03/31/2025 10:46:55 AM CRH151